Utah statutes.
9-9-213.   Concurrent state and federal jurisdiction over hunting, trapping, or fishing offenses on reservations.

(1)  With respect to any of the offenses enumerated in this chapter, over which federal courts may have lawful jurisdiction, the jurisdiction of the courts of the state of Utah shall be concurrent and not exclusive.

(2)  It shall be the duty of the courts of the state of Utah to order delivery to the proper authorities of the federal government for prosecution, any offender, there to be dealt with according to law or regulations authorized by law, where such authorities consent to exercise jurisdiction lawfully vested in them over the said offender.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 241, 1992 General Session

